Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.360

Conservation of stormwater and sewer services—Use of public moneys.

Any city, code city, town, county, special purpose district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation that is engaged in the sale or distribution of stormwater or sewer services may use public moneys or credit derived from operating revenues from the sale of stormwater or sewer services to assist the owners of structures or equipment in financing the acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of stormwater or sewer services in such structures or equipment. Except for the necessary support of the poor and infirm, an appropriate charge-back shall be made for the extension of public moneys or credit. The charge-back shall be a lien against the structure benefited or a security interest in the equipment benefited.

[ 1998 c 31 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1998 c 31: "The legislature finds that the voters approved an amendment to Article VIII, section 10 of the state Constitution in 1997. The legislature finds that this amendment to the state Constitution will allow necessary improvements to be made to stormwater and sewer services so that less pollution is discharged into the waters of the state, less treatment will be needed, and capacity for existing treatment systems will be saved. It is the intent of the legislature to enact legislation that grants specific authority to units of local government that provide stormwater and sewer services to operate programs that are consistent with the authority granted in House Joint Resolution No. 4209." [ 1998 c 31 s 1.]

Effective date—1998 c 31 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 1998." [ 1998 c 31 s 3.]